Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 22 COLLECTION AGENCIES
§ 26-2239. Exemptions.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to the following:

Persons licensed to practice law in this state, to the extent that they are retained by their clients to engage in activities authorized by this act, and such activities are incidental to the practice of law. Such exemption shall not apply to an attorney engaged in a separate business conducting the activities authorized by this act;

Any regulated lender as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, and its subsidiary, affiliate or agent, to the extent that the regulated lender, subsidiary, affiliate or agent collects for the regulated lender or engages in acts governed by this act which are incidental to the business of a regulated lender;

Any bank, trust company, credit union, insurance company or industrial loan company authorized to do business in this state;

Any federal, state or local governmental agency or instrumentality;

Any real estate broker or real estate salesman licensed under the laws of and residing within this state while engaged in acts authorized by his real estate license;

Any person authorized to engage in escrow business in this state while engaged in authorized escrow business;

Any mortgage lender engaged in the regular business of a mortgage lender as defined in section 26-31-201, Idaho Code, except a mortgage lender engaged in a separate business conducting the activities authorized by this act;

Any court-appointed trustee, receiver or conservator;

Any telephone corporation as defined in subsection (14) of section 62-603, Idaho Code, whose initial request for payment on behalf of such telephone corporation or on behalf of another person is made by the telephone corporation as a part of regular telecommunications billings to its customers and at a time before the account, bill, claim or other indebtedness becomes past due or delinquent;

Any person while acting as a debt collector for another person, both of whom are related by common ownership or affiliated by corporate control, if the person acting as a debt collector does so only for persons to whom he is so related or affiliated and if the principal business of such person is not the collection of debts.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 18, p. 118; am. 1990, ch. 346, § 6, p. 930; am. 1993, ch. 165, § 5, p. 416; am. 2003, ch. 112, § 1, p. 355; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 22, p. 953; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 8, p. 108; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 9, p. 1008; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 1, p. 260.

§ 26-2240. Agent identification — Quarterly notice — Fee.

Each applicant for a license under this act, with its initial license application, and each licensee at annual renewal, shall file with the director a list of all agents including the name of each agent and any other identifying information the director may require. A fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each listed agent shall accompany the list. Each licensee shall notify the director in writing of any additions to its agent list no less often than every calendar quarter. A fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be paid to the director for each additionally identified agent in the quarterly notification of additions to a licensee’s agent list. An agent is not required to be listed, nor the fee paid therefor, unless the agent acted for the licensee for more than thirty (30) business days.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2240, as added by 1997, ch. 370, § 10, p. 1176; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 23, p. 954.

§ 26-2241, 26-2242. Expenses of examination — Payment — Denial, suspension, revocation of license. [Repealed.]

§ 26-2243. Property right in accounts — Practice of law prohibited.

A licensee under this act shall have a property right in any account assigned to it for collection; provided, however, no right herein granted shall authorize such licensee to engage in the practice of law.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 22, p. 118; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 24, p. 954.

§ 26-2244. Cease and desist orders, penalty.

Whenever it appears to the director that it is in the public interest, he may order any person to cease and desist from acts, practices, or omissions which constitute a violation of this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act.

Whenever, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the director finds that any person has engaged in any act, practice, or omission constituting a violation of any provision of this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act, the director may order the person to cease and desist from such acts, practices or omissions and:

Impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation upon any person found to have violated any provision of this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act;

Issue an order restoring to any person in interest any consideration that may have been acquired or transferred in violation of this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act; and

Issue an order that the person violating this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act pay costs, which in the discretion of the director may include an amount representing reasonable attorney’s fees and reimbursement for investigative efforts.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 23, p. 118; am. 1974, ch. 24, § 28, p. 744; am. 1990, ch. 346, § 9, p. 930; am. 1993, ch. 165, § 7, p. 416; am. 2002, ch. 190, § 6, p. 544; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 25, p. 955.

§ 26-2245. Director’s power to enjoin violations.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person, or employee or agent thereof, has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice or omission constituting a violation of any provision of this act, or any rule or order issued hereunder, he may in his discretion bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any such acts, practices or omissions and to enforce compliance with this act or any rule adopted or order issued hereunder. Upon a showing that a person, or employee or agent thereof, has engaged in or is about to engage in an act, practice or omission constituting a violation of this act or any rule adopted or order issued hereunder, a permanent or temporary injunction, or restraining order shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed, which may be the director, for the defendant’s assets. The director shall not be required to furnish a bond.

In addition to the foregoing, the director, in his discretion and upon a showing in any court of competent jurisdiction that a person has violated any provision of this act or rule adopted or order issued hereunder, may be granted the following additional remedies:

An order restoring to any person in interest any consideration that may have been acquired or transferred in violation of this act;

An order that the person violating this act, rule or order issued hereunder, pay a civil penalty to the department in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation;

An order allowing the director to recover costs, which in the discretion of the court may include an amount representing reasonable attorney’s fees and reimbursement for investigative efforts; and

An order granting other appropriate remedies upon a proper showing.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 24, p. 118; am. 2002, ch. 190, § 7, p. 544; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 26, p. 955.

§ 26-2246. Closure or discontinuance of operations — Requirements.

Whenever the operations of a collection agency licensee under this act are closed or discontinued due to revocation, termination, or relinquishment of a collection agency license, or for any other reason, the collection agency shall, within thirty (30) days following the closure or discontinuance of operations, furnish the director with sufficient proof in a form to be determined by the director that:

The collection agency has remitted to all of its creditor clients all moneys collected on their behalf and due such creditor clients;

All collection accounts, judgments obtained, and other accounts have been returned to the creditor clients or other proper parties, and if appropriate, assigned by the collection agency to its creditor clients or other proper parties; and

All valuable papers, documents, judgments and other property provided to the collection agency by its creditor clients or other parties in connection with the collection agency’s collection activities have been returned to the creditor clients or other proper parties.

A collection agency which holds a license issued pursuant to this act, upon closure or discontinuance of its operations, shall maintain the bonds required of such licensee to conduct a collection agency business until a final accounting of its affairs, as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, has been filed with and approved by the director.

Whenever the operations of a collection agency are closed or discontinued as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, in the event the collection agency does not complete all requirements of such subsection within thirty (30) days following the closure or discontinuance of operations, upon demand by the director, the collection agency shall permit the director to take possession of its business records, bank accounts, including creditor client trust accounts, other property belonging to its creditor clients or third parties, and its assets. The director may then liquidate the collection agency’s business, return any moneys owed to the collection agency’s creditor clients, return the collection agency’s accounts to its creditor clients, return or assign any judgments to the agency’s creditor clients, and take any other actions which are reasonably necessary to cause the collection agency to liquidate its assets and to comply with subsection (1) of this section.

If a collection agency refuses to permit the director to take possession of its business records, bank accounts, creditor client trust accounts, other property belonging to its creditor clients or third parties and its assets, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction in the county of the collection agency’s principal place of business for the appointment of a receiver or conservator as set forth in section 26-2245(1), Idaho Code. Such receiver or conservator may be the director.

The expenses of the receiver or conservator and attorney’s fees, and all expenses necessarily incurred in liquidation of the collection agency, shall be paid out of the funds in the control of the director or conservator, to the extent those funds exceed any sums due and owing to the collection agency’s creditor clients or other proper parties. To the extent funds in the control of the receiver are not sufficient to pay all sums due and owing to the collection agency’s creditor clients or other proper parties and to pay the costs of a receiver or conservator and of liquidation of the collection agency, the collection agency and its owners, shareholders, or interest holders shall be responsible for the balance of any reasonably necessary costs and fees of liquidation.
History.

I.C.,§ 26-2246, as added by 2008, ch. 347, § 28, p. 956.

§ 26-2247. Institution of criminal proceedings.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this act or of any rule or order hereunder to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney, either of whom may in his discretion, with or without such a reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings under this act.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 26, p. 118.

§ 26-2248. Administration of act.

The administration of the provisions of this act shall be under the general supervision and control of the director, subject to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The director may from time to time adopt, amend, and rescind rules and issue orders necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. No rule or order may be made unless the director finds that the action is necessary or appropriate for the public interest or for the protection of the public consistent with the purposes of this act.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 27, p. 118; am. 2008, ch. 347, § 29, p. 957.

§ 26-2249. Judicial review of final orders of director.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the director may obtain judicial review of that order pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

History.

1970, ch. 53, § 28, p. 118; am. 1993, ch. 216, § 12, p. 587.

§ 26-2250. Foreign permittees. [Repealed.]

§ 26-2251. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2251, as added by 2008, ch. 347, § 31, p. 957.

§ 26-2252. Agents in state. [Repealed.]